New Jersey, session 221, S2717.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  A taxpayer, who is either self-employed, an independent contractor, or an employee, shall be allowed to deduct from the taxpayers gross income for the taxable year the expenses incurred by the utilization of the taxpayers home as a principal place of business during the COVID-19 public health emergency as declared by the Governor in Executive Order No. 103 of 2020 and any extension thereof. b.    As used in this section: Principal place of business means the part of a home used primarily to conduct business for an employer, personal business, or trade on a regular basis.  A home office qualifies as a principal place of business if there are no other fixed locations where the taxpayer can conduct business or if the taxpayer spends a significant amount of time conducting business exclusively from their home office, even if on occasion having the ability to work at another location, due to the COVID-19 pandemic. Expenses means unreimbursed supplies and equipment, necessary to conduct business from a home office including a desk, computer, cell phone, printer, paper, and other necessary equipment and supplies. c.     The director is authorized to issue rules and regulations necessary to implement this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply retroactively to taxable years during which the Public Health Emergency and the State of Emergency declared by the Governor in Executive Order No. 103 of 2020 and any extension thereof concerning the COVID-19 pandemic are ongoing.